Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1618
Hazard potential classification, defined.

Hazard potential classification means classification of dams according to the degree of incremental adverse consequences of a failure or misoperation of a dam but does not reflect on the current condition of a dam, including, but not limited to, safety, structural integrity, or flood routing capacity.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 18.